California statutes. Penal Code
Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any firearm not immediately recognizable as a firearm is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 101.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24590.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any firearm not immediately recognizable as a firearm is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Undetectable Firearm and Firearm Detection Equipment [24610. - 24690.]

24610.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any undetectable firearm is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 102.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24680.

Any firearm detection equipment newly installed in a nonfederal public building in this state shall be of a type identified by either the United States Attorney General, the Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary of the Treasury, as appropriate, as available state-of-the-art equipment capable of detecting an undetectable firearm, while distinguishing innocuous metal objects likely to be carried on one’s person sufficient for reasonable passage of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

24690.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any undetectable firearm is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Wallet Gun [24710. - 24790.]

24710.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any wallet gun is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 103.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24790.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any wallet gun is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 4. STORAGE OF FIREARMS [25000. - 25225.]



  CHAPTER 1. Preliminary Provisions [25000. - 25000.]

25000.

As used in this division, “child” means a person under 18 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Criminal Storage of Firearm [25100. - 25145.]

25100.

(a) Except as provided in Section 25105, a person commits the crime of “criminal storage of a firearm in the first degree” if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person keeps any firearm within any premises that are under the person’s custody or control.

(2) The person knows or reasonably should know that a child is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or legal guardian, or that a person prohibited from possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law is likely to gain access to the firearm.

(3) The child obtains access to the firearm and thereby causes death or great bodily injury to the child or any other person, or the person prohibited from possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law obtains access to the firearm and thereby causes death or great bodily injury to themselves or any other person.

(b) Except as provided in Section 25105, a person commits the crime of “criminal storage of a firearm in the second degree” if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person keeps any firearm within any premises that are under the person’s custody or control.

(2) The person knows or reasonably should know that a
 child is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or legal guardian, or that a person prohibited from possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law is likely to gain access to the firearm.

(3) The child obtains access to the firearm and thereby causes injury, other than great bodily injury, to the child or any other person, or carries the firearm either to a public place or in violation of Section 417, or the person prohibited from possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law obtains access to the firearm and thereby causes injury, other than great bodily injury, to themselves or any other person, or carries the firearm either to a public place or in violation of Section 417.

(c) Except
 as provided in Section 25105, a person commits the crime of “criminal storage of a firearm in the third degree” if the person keeps any firearm within any premises that are under the person’s custody or control and negligently stores or leaves a firearm in a location where the person knows, or reasonably should know, that a child is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or legal guardian.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 5.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

Section 25100 does not apply whenever any of the following occurs:

(a) The child obtains the firearm as a result of an illegal entry to any premises by any person.

(b) The firearm is securely stored, as defined in Section 25145.

(c) The firearm is carried or readily controlled by the lawful owner or another lawful authorized user, as defined in Section 25145.

(d) The person is a peace officer or a member of the United States Armed Forces or the National Guard and the child obtains the
 firearm during, or incidental to, the performance of the person’s duties.

(e) The child obtains, or obtains and discharges, the firearm in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 7.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25110.

(a) Criminal storage of a firearm in the first degree is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) Criminal storage of a firearm in the second degree is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) Criminal storage of a firearm in the third degree is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 730, Sec. 2.   (AB 231)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25115.

If a person who allegedly violated Section 25100 is the parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies as the result of an accidental shooting, the district attorney shall consider, among other factors, the impact of the injury or death on the person alleged to have violated Section 25100 when deciding whether to prosecute the alleged violation. It is the Legislature’s intent that a parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies as the result
 of an accidental shooting shall be prosecuted only in those instances in which the parent or guardian behaved in a grossly negligent manner or where similarly egregious circumstances exist. This section shall not otherwise restrict, in any manner, the factors that a district attorney may consider when deciding whether to prosecute an alleged violation of Section 25100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25120.

(a) If a person who allegedly violated Section 25100 is the parent or guardian of a child who was injured or who died as the result of an accidental shooting, no arrest of the person for the alleged violation of Section 25100 shall occur until at least seven days after the date upon which the accidental shooting occurred.

(b) In addition to the limitation stated in subdivision (a), before arresting a person for a
 violation of Section 25100, a law enforcement officer shall consider the health status of a child who suffered great bodily injury as the result of an accidental shooting, if the person to be arrested is the parent or guardian of the injured child. The intent of this section is to encourage law enforcement officials to delay the arrest of a parent or guardian of a seriously injured child while the child remains on life-support equipment or is in a similarly critical medical condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25125.

(a) The fact that a person who allegedly violated Section 25100 attended a firearm safety training course prior to the purchase of the firearm that was obtained by a child in violation of Section 25100 shall be considered a mitigating factor by a district attorney when deciding whether to prosecute the alleged violation.

(b) In any action or trial commenced under Section 25100,
 the fact that the person who allegedly violated Section 25100 attended a firearm safety training course prior to the purchase of the firearm that was obtained by a child in violation of Section 25100 is admissible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25130.

Every person licensed under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall post within the licensed premises the notice required by Section 26835, disclosing the duty imposed by this chapter upon any person who keeps a loaded firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25135.

(a) A person who is 18 years of age or older, and who is the owner, lessee, renter, or other legal occupant of a residence, who owns a firearm and who knows or has reason to know that another person also residing therein is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm shall not keep in that residence a firearm unless one of the following applies:

(1) The firearm is securely stored, as defined in Section 25145.

(2) The firearm is carried or readily controlled by the lawful owner or another lawful authorized user, as defined in Section
 25145.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(c) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and do not restrict the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 9.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25140.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a person shall, when leaving a handgun in an unattended vehicle, lock the handgun in the vehicle’s trunk, lock the handgun in a locked container and place the container out of plain view, lock the handgun in a locked container that is permanently affixed to the vehicle’s interior and not in plain view, or lock the handgun in a locked toolbox or utility box.

(b) A peace officer, when leaving a handgun in an unattended vehicle not
 equipped with a trunk, may, if unable to otherwise comply with subdivision (a), lock the handgun out of plain view within the center utility console of that motor vehicle with a padlock, keylock, combination lock, or other similar locking device.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) (1) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Locked container” means a secure container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, keylock, combination lock, or similar locking device. The term “locked container” does not include the utility or glove compartment of a motor vehicle.

(B) “Locked toolbox or utility box” means a fully enclosed container that is permanently affixed to the bed of a pickup truck or vehicle that does not contain a trunk, and is locked by a padlock, keylock, combination lock, or other similar locking device.

(C) “Peace officer” means a sworn officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or a sworn federal law enforcement officer, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course and scope of that officer’s duties, while that officer is on duty or off duty.

(D) “Trunk” means the fully enclosed and locked main storage or luggage compartment of a vehicle that is not accessible from the passenger compartment. A trunk does not include the rear of a hatchback, station wagon, or sport utility vehicle, any compartment which has a window, or a toolbox or utility box attached to the bed of a pickup truck.

(E) “Vehicle” has the same meaning as specified in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) For
 purposes of this section, a vehicle is unattended when a person who is lawfully carrying or transporting a handgun in a vehicle is not within close enough proximity to the vehicle to reasonably prevent unauthorized access to the vehicle or its contents.

(3) For purposes of this section, plain view includes any area of the vehicle that is visible by peering through the windows of the vehicle, including windows that are tinted, with or without illumination.

(e) This section does not apply to a peace officer during circumstances requiring immediate aid or action that are within the course of his or her official duties.

(f) This section does not supersede any local ordinance that regulates the storage of handguns in unattended vehicles if the ordinance was in effect before September 26,
 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   (SB 1382)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25145.

(a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a person shall ensure that any firearm the person possesses in a residence is securely stored whenever the firearm is not being carried or readily controlled by the person or another lawful authorized user.

(b) A firearm is “securely stored” if it is maintained within, locked by, or disabled using a certified firearm safety device or a secure gun safe.

(c) For purposes of this section and Sections 25105, 25135, 25205, 27882, and 27883, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Authorized
 user” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16745.

(2) “Certified firearm safety device” means any firearm safety device or gun safe that is listed on the Department of Justice’s roster of tested and approved firearm safety devices certified for sale pursuant to Section 23655.

(3) “Readily controlled” by a person or another lawful authorized user means either of the following:

(A) The person or other lawful authorized user is carrying the firearm on their person.

(B) The person or other lawful authorized user is within close enough proximity to the firearm to readily prevent unauthorized users from gaining access to the firearm.

(4) “Secure gun safe” means a gun safe that meets the standards for gun safes adopted pursuant to Section 23650.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is punishable by a fine of up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first violation and up to five hundred dollars ($500) for a second violation. A third and any subsequent violation is a misdemeanor.

(2) A person shall not be penalized for violating this section if they secure their firearm using a firearm safety device or gun safe that they reasonably believed to meet the requirements of this section, including a firearm safety device that was certified at the time the individual purchased the device or a safe that
 met the standards for gun safes adopted pursuant to Section 23650 at the time the individual purchased the safe.

(e) The provisions of this section are cumulative and do not restrict the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(f) The Department of Justice shall seek to inform residents about the standards of storage of firearms as outlined in this section.

(g) This section does not apply to
 unloaded antique firearms, as defined in Section 921(a)(16) of Title 18 of the United States Code, or firearms that are permanently inoperable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 10.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Storage of Firearm Where Child Obtains Access and Carries Firearm Off-Premises [25200. - 25225.]

25200.

(a) If all of the following conditions are satisfied, a person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine:

(1) The person keeps a firearm, loaded or unloaded, within any premises that are under the person’s custody or control.

(2) The person knows or reasonably should know that a child is likely to gain access to that firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or legal guardian, or that a person prohibited from possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law is likely to
 gain access to the firearm.

(3) The child or the prohibited person obtains access to that firearm and thereafter carries that firearm off-premises.

(b) If all of the following conditions are satisfied, a person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine:

(1) The person keeps any firearm within any premises that are under the person’s custody or control.

(2) The person knows or reasonably should know that a child is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or legal guardian, or that a person prohibited from
 possessing a firearm or deadly weapon pursuant to state or federal law is likely to gain access to the firearm.

(3) The child or the prohibited person obtains access to the firearm and thereafter carries that firearm off-premises to any public or private preschool, elementary school, middle school, high school, or to any school-sponsored event, activity, or performance, whether occurring on school grounds or elsewhere.

(c) A firearm that a child or prohibited person gains access to and carries off-premises in violation of this section shall be deemed “used in the commission of any misdemeanor as provided in this code or any felony” for the purpose of Section 29300 regarding the authority to confiscate firearms and other deadly weapons as a nuisance.

(d) As used in this section, “off-premises” means premises other than the premises where the firearm was stored.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 840, Sec. 8.   (SB 172)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25205.

Section 25200 does not apply if any of the following are true:

(a) The child obtains the firearm as a result of an illegal entry into any premises by any person.

(b) The firearm is securely stored, as defined in Section 25145.

(c) The firearm is carried or readily controlled by the lawful owner or another lawful authorized user, as defined in Section 25145.

(d) The person is a peace officer or a member of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard and the child obtains the firearm
 during, or incidental to, the performance of the person’s duties.

(e) The child obtains, or obtains and discharges, the firearm in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 12.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25210.

If a person who allegedly violated Section 25200 is the parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies as the result of an accidental shooting, the district attorney shall consider, among other factors, the impact of the injury or death on the person alleged to have violated Section 25200 when deciding whether to prosecute the alleged violation. It is the Legislature’s intent that a parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies as the result of an accidental shooting shall be prosecuted only in those instances in which the parent or guardian behaved in a grossly negligent manner or where similarly egregious circumstances exist. This section shall not otherwise restrict, in any manner, the factors that a district attorney may consider when deciding whether to
 prosecute alleged violations of Section 25200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25215.

(a) If a person who allegedly violated Section 25200 is the parent or guardian of a child who was injured or who died as the result of an accidental shooting, no arrest of the person for the alleged violation of Section 25200 shall occur until at least seven days after the date upon which the accidental shooting occurred.

(b) In addition to the limitation contained in subdivision (a), before arresting a person for a violation of Section 25200, a law enforcement officer shall consider the health status of a child who suffers great bodily injury as the result of an accidental shooting, if the person to be arrested is the parent or guardian of the injured child. The intent of this section is to
 encourage law enforcement officials to delay the arrest of a parent or guardian of a seriously injured child while the child remains on life-support equipment or is in a similarly critical medical condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25220.

(a) The fact that the person who allegedly violated Section 25200 attended a firearm safety training course prior to the purchase of the firearm that is obtained by a child in violation of Section 25200 shall be considered a mitigating factor by a district attorney when deciding whether to prosecute the alleged violation.

(b) In any action or trial commenced under Section 25200, the fact that the person who allegedly violated Section 25200 attended a firearm safety training course prior to the purchase of the firearm that was obtained by a child in violation of Section 25200 is admissible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

25225.

Every person licensed under Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, shall post within the licensed premises the notice required by Section 26835, disclosing the duty imposed by this chapter upon any person who keeps any firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 4.5. LOST OR STOLEN FIREARMS [25250. - 25275.]

25250.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2017, every person shall report the loss or theft of a firearm he or she owns or possesses to a local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the theft or loss occurred within five days of the time he or she knew or reasonably should have known that the firearm had been stolen or lost.

(b) Every person who has reported a firearm lost or stolen under subdivision (a) shall notify the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the theft or loss occurred within five days if the firearm is subsequently recovered by the person.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall not be required to report the loss or theft of a firearm
 that is an antique firearm within the meaning of subdivision (c) of Section 16170.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

25255.

Section 25250 shall not apply to the following:

(a) Any law enforcement agency or peace officer acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or official duties if he or she reports the loss or theft to his or her employing agency.

(b) Any United States marshal or member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, while engaged in his or her official duties.

(c) Any person who is licensed, pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, and who reports the theft or loss in accordance with Section 923(g)(6) of Title 18
 of the United States Code, or the successor provision thereto, and applicable regulations issued thereto.

(d) Any person whose firearm was lost or stolen prior to July 1, 2017.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

25260.

Pursuant to Section 11108.2, every sheriff or police chief shall submit a description of each firearm that has been reported lost or stolen directly into the Department of Justice Automated Firearms System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 864, Sec. 6.   (AB 2222)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63.)
-------------------------------------------

25265.

(a) Every person who violates Section 25250 is, for a first violation, guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) Every person who violates Section 25250 is, for a second violation, guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) Every person who violates Section 25250 is, for a third or subsequent violation, guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

25270.

Every person reporting a lost or stolen firearm pursuant to Section 25250 shall report the make, model, and serial number of the firearm, if known by the person, and any additional relevant information required by the local law enforcement agency taking the report.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

25275.

(a) No person shall report to a local law enforcement agency that a firearm has been lost or stolen, knowing the report to be false. A violation of this section is an infraction, punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first offense, and by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a second or subsequent offense.

(b) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other law.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 5. CARRYING FIREARMS [25300. - 26406.]



  CHAPTER 1. Miscellaneous Rules Relating to Carrying Firearms [25300. - 25350.]

25300.

(a) A person commits criminal possession of a firearm when the person carries a firearm in a public place or on any public street while masked so as to hide the person’s identity.

(b) Criminal possession of a firearm is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A peace officer in performance of the officer’s duties.

(2) A full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal
 government who is carrying out official duties while in this state.

(3) Any person summoned by any of the officers enumerated in paragraph (1) or (2) to assist in making an arrest or preserving the peace while that person is actually engaged in assisting that officer.

(4) The possession of an unloaded firearm or a firearm loaded with blank ammunition by an authorized participant in, or while rehearsing for, a motion picture, television, video production, entertainment event, entertainment activity, or lawfully organized and conducted activity when the participant lawfully uses the firearm as part of that production, event, or activity.

(5) The possession of a firearm by a licensed hunter while actually engaged in lawful hunting, or while going directly to or returning directly from the hunting
 expedition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 542.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

25350.

(a) If any section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, or phrase of any provision in this division is for any reason held unconstitutional, that decision does not affect the validity of any other provision in the division. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed the provisions listed in this division and each chapter, section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, and phrase of those provisions irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subdivisions, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(b) If any application of any provision in this division to
 any person, group of persons, or circumstances is found by a court to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining applications of that provision to all other persons and circumstances shall be severed and shall not be affected. All constitutionally valid applications of this division shall be severed from any applications that a court finds to be invalid, leaving the valid applications in force, because it is the Legislature’s intent and priority that the valid applications be allowed to stand alone. Even if a reviewing court finds a provision of this division to impose an unconstitutional burden in a large or substantial fraction of relevant cases, the applications that do not present an unconstitutional burden shall be severed from the remaining applications and shall remain in force, and shall be treated as if the Legislature had enacted a statute limited to the persons, group of persons, or
 circumstances for which the statute’s application does not present an unconstitutional burden. If any court declares or finds a provision of this division facially unconstitutional, when discrete applications of that provision can be enforced against a person, group of persons, or circumstances without violating the United States Constitution and the California Constitution, those applications shall be severed from all remaining applications of the provision, and the provision shall be interpreted as if the Legislature had enacted a provision limited to the persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which the provision’s application will not violate the United States Constitution and the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 7.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Carrying a Concealed Firearm [25400. - 25700.]



  ARTICLE 1. Crime of Carrying a Concealed Firearm [25400. - 25400.]

25400.

(a) A person is guilty of carrying a concealed firearm when the person does any of the following:

(1) Carries concealed within any vehicle that is under the person’s control or direction any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(2) Carries concealed upon the person any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(3) Causes to be carried concealed within any vehicle in which the person is an occupant any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(b) A firearm carried openly in a belt holster is not concealed within the meaning of this section.

(c) Carrying a concealed firearm in violation of this section is punishable as follows:

(1) If the person previously has been convicted of any felony, or of any crime made punishable by a provision listed in Section 16580, as a felony.

(2) If the firearm is stolen and the person knew or had reasonable cause to believe that it was stolen, as a felony.

(3) If the person is an active participant in a criminal street gang, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 186.22, under the Street Terrorism Enforcement and Prevention Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 186.20) of Title 7 of Part 1), as
 a felony.

(4) If the person is not in lawful possession of the firearm or the person is within a class of persons prohibited from possessing or acquiring a firearm pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as a felony.

(5) If the person has been convicted of a crime against a person or property, or of a narcotics or dangerous drug violation, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(6) If both of the following conditions are met, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by
 imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(A) The pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person is loaded, or both it and the unexpended ammunition capable of being discharged from it are in the immediate possession of the person or readily accessible to that person.

(B) The person is not listed with the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 11106 as the registered owner of that pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(7) In all cases other than those specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars
 ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) (1) Every person convicted under this section who previously has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense enumerated in Section 23515 shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for at least three months and not exceeding six months, or, if granted probation, or if the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that the person be imprisoned in a county jail for at least three months.

(2) Every person convicted under this section who has previously been convicted of any felony, or of any crime made punishable by a provision listed in Section 16580, if probation is granted, or if the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition thereof that the person be imprisoned in a county jail for not less than three months.

(e) The court shall apply the three-month minimum sentence as specified in subdivision (d), except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence without the minimum imprisonment required in subdivision (d) or by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence with conditions other than those set forth in subdivision (d), in which case, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by that disposition.(f) A peace officer may arrest a person for a violation of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person is not listed with the Department of Justice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 11106 as the registered owner of the pistol,
 revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, and one or more of the conditions in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) is met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 543.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Peace Officer Exemption [25450. - 25475.]

25450.

As provided in this article, Section 25400 does not apply to, or affect, any of the following:

(a) Any peace officer, listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, or subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, whether active or honorably retired.

(b) Any other duly appointed peace officer.

(c) Any honorably retired peace officer listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5.
